src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
asehaš:aseh ASEHAS "thin A" ;
asihaš:asi7h ASEHAS ;
jurdilmeahttun:jurdilmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
bahábeakkálmas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahá#beakkálmass DEARVVASLAS ;
barggos+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:barggos JOHTIL; !
beakkán+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:beakkán BEAKKAN; !
oahpatmeahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oahpatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
bisovaš:bisovažž DEARVVASLAS ;
bivval:bivval JOHTIL ;
boranas:boranass DEARVVASLAS ;
bostta:bos'tag8 GUOHCA ;
caggameahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:caggameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
ceaikkas:ceaj'ka GARAS ;
civnna:civdnag8 GUOHCA ;
deives+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:deives JOHTIL; !
diehttevaš:diehttevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
dimis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dipm LINIS ;
dovdameahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dovdameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
duhttivaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duhttivažž DEARVVASLAS ;
dáddjil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dáddjil JOHTIL; !
fadnil:fadnil JOHTIL ;
galššas:gal'ša GARAS ;
garvemeahttun+Use/Sub:garvi7meahttu MEAHTTUS ;
gierdevaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gierdevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
gillil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gillil JOHTIL; !
girjjat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:girjjag BEAKKAN ;
gaskageardán:gaska#geardán BEAKKAN ;
golnnas:goldna GARAS ;
groavis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:groavv SUVRRIS ;
guhkebuš:guhkebužž STUORIBUS ;
guhkálmas:guhkálmass DEARVVASLAS ;
guohca:guohccag8 GUOHCA ;
guovddáš:guovddáž BEAKKAN_NOCOMP ;
guovddáš+Use/Sub:guovddaž BEAKKAN_NOCOMP ;
gálššas:gál'ša GARAS ;
gárka:gárkkag8 GUOHCA ;
gáđaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG:gáh'ta IPMAHA ;
heittot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG:heittoh HEITTOHA ;
heivetmeahttun:heivetmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
hillján+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hillján JOHTIL; !
hirbmat:hirbmad BEAKKAN ;
huvlla:huv'lag8 GUOHCA ;
hávrra:háv'rag8 GUOHCA ;
guovtteoaivvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guovtte#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
máŋggaoaivvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:máŋgga#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
čáhppesoaivvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čáhppes#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
fiskesoaivvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fiskes#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
ihcaválddat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ihca#válddag BEAKKAN ;
imaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG:ipma IPMAHA ;
jievjjas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiev'ja GARAS ;
jámmis:jám'm LINIS ;
jápmemeahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jápmemeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
kroavis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:kroavv SUVRRIS ;
kuonna:kuon'nag8 GUOHCA ;
lagabuš:lagabužž STUORIBUS ;
linis:litn LINIS ;
linjas:litnja GARAS ;
luohttevaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luohttevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
lávžegullil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lávže#gullil JOHTIL; !
meamma:meam'mag8 GUOHCA ;
meađmma:meađmmag8 GUOHCA ;
mihtitmeahttun:mihtitmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
muttát:muttág BEAKKAN ;
máttibuš:máttibužž STUORIBUS ;
nanus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nannu NANUS ;
njuohpa:njuohppag8 GUOHCA ;
nohkavaš:nohkavažž DEARVVASLAS ;
nuppát:nuppád BEAKKAN_NOCOMP ;
oahppil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oahppil JOHTIL; !
oanehaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oaneh ASEHAS ;
oktageardán:okta#geardán BEAKKAN ;
olatmeahttun:olatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
olggubuš:olggubužž STUORIBUS ;
ođas:ođđa GARAS ;
ravddabuš:ravddabužž STUORIBUS ;
riekteoahppavaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:riekte#oahppavažž DEARVVASLAS ;
rittubuš:rittubužž STUORIBUS ;
roavis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roavv LINIS ;
seainnibuš:seainnibužž STUORIBUS ;
sealvvas:seal'va GARAS ;
seavdda:seav'dag8 GUOHCA ;
siiddalmas:siiddalmass DEARVVASLAS ;
siskkibuš:siskkibužž STUORIBUS ;
skáddjil:skáddjil JOHTIL ;
skárppis:skár'p LINIS ;
smoahtis:smoahtt LINIS ;
snuolggas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snuol'ga GARAS ;
sokkibuš:sokkibužž STUORIBUS ;
sorjjasmeahttun:sorjjasmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
spálžžas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:spál'ža GARAS ;
sreaŋggis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sreaŋ'g LINIS ;
steavdda:steav'dag8 GUOHCA ;
stuorebuš:stuorebužž STUORIBUS ;
suollemas:suollemass DEARVVASLAS ;
suvrris:suv'r SUVRRIS ;
unohas:unoh UNOHAS ;
veaddjil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:veaddjil JOHTIL; !
veasttabuš:veasttabužž STUORIBUS ;
vuollegaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuolleg ASEHAS ;
vuolligaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuolli7g ASEHAS ;
vuonabuš:vuonabužž STUORIBUS ;
vuordemeahttun:vuordemeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
váivváš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:váivváš BEAKKAN; !
vánis:vátn LINIS ;
árggebuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:árggebužž STUORIBUS ;
árvitmeahttun:árvitmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
áššáisoahppevaš:áššái#soahppevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
čielggas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čiel'ga GARAS ;
čivrra:čiv0rag8 GUOHCA ;
čorgatmeahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čorgatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
čuoddjil:čuoddjil JOHTIL ;
šnjilččas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:šnjil'ča GARAS ;
čohkkesalit:čohkkes#alih BEAKKAN ;
